Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-554
Clerical assistants; not subject to act.

Nothing in the Abstracters Act shall be construed as prohibiting any individual or business entity holding a valid certificate of authority from employing such clerical and stenographic assistants as may be necessary in the conduct of its business who are not registered under the Abstracters Act.

Laws 1965, c. 453, § 20, p. 1446;

Laws 1973, LB 330, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-528;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 24.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).